Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 533 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Dependent child" means a person under:
(a) Eighteen (18) years of age; or
(b) Twenty-one (21) years of age, if the person is an individual with an
intellectual disability;
(2) "Family impact statement" means an oral or written statement to the court prior
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1529
to sentencing, which may contain but is not limited to testimony, video, or other
documentation from family and community members about the impact the
defendant's incarceration would have on the dependent child;
(3) "Individual with an intellectual disability" has the same meaning as in KRS
510.010; and
(4) (a) "Primary caretaker of a dependent child" means:
1. A parent or legal guardian who has consistently assumed
responsibility for the housing, health, education, and safety of a child
prior to the parent or legal guardian's incarceration; or
2. A woman who has given birth to a child or remains pregnant while
awaiting her sentencing hearing and who expresses a willingness to
assume responsibility for the housing, health, education, and safety of
that child.
(b) A parent or legal guardian who, in the best interests of the child, has
arranged for the temporary care of the child in the home of a relative or
other responsible adult shall not for that reason be excluded from the
definition of "primary caretaker of a dependent child."
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 533 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon conviction, the court shall consider the defendant's status as a primary
caretaker of a dependent child before imposing a sentence unless:
(a) The defendant is classified as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) The victim is a child; or
(c) A statute prohibits probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge.
(2) The court shall make written findings concerning a defendant's status as a
primary caretaker of a dependent child. Upon a finding that a defendant is a
primary caretaker of a dependent child, the court shall consider an alternative
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1529
sentence.
(3) When determining whether to impose an alternative sentence under subsection
(2) of this section, the court shall consider:
(a) The criminal history of the defendant;
(b) The seriousness of the offense;
(c) Whether the offense was against persons or property, with greater weight
given to offenses against persons;
(d) The likelihood the defendant will reoffend and whether the likelihood might
be reduced by in-patient or out-patient treatment for substance use disorder;
(e) The age of the dependent child, with strong consideration given to avoid
disruption to the caregiving of an infant, pre-school, or school-age
dependent child;
(f) Whether the defendant is breastfeeding the dependent child;
(g) The role of the defendant in the day-to-day educational and medical needs
of the dependent child;
(h) Any special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the dependent
child;
(i) The role of the defendant in the financial support of the dependent child;
(j) The relationship of the defendant and the dependent child; and
(k) The best interests of the dependent child and the community.
(4) The defendant shall have the right to present an alternative sentencing plan and
a family impact statement to the court.
(5) If the court determines that a defendant is a primary caretaker of a dependent
child and imposes an alternative sentence, the court may, in addition to other
reasonable conditions, require the defendant to participate in programs or
services with a focus on parent-child unity or supporting the parent-child
relationship, including but not limited to:
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1529
(a) Substance use disorder treatment and prevention services;
(b) Domestic violence education and prevention services;
(c) Child abuse treatment and prevention services;
(d) Parenting classes;
(e) Anger management;
(f) Vocational and educational training;
(g) Targeted case management services that assist with access to transportation
and affordable and safe housing;
(h) Literacy and financial literacy training;
(i) Individual and family counseling and therapy; and
(j) Restorative practices designed to make the participant accountable to the
victim, when there is an identified victim and when it is safe to do so.
(6) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a court that imposes an alternative
sentence under this section shall not require the defendant to commit to a term of
confinement unless the defendant fails to adhere to or complete the conditions of
the alternative sentence. If the defendant violates the terms or conditions of the
alternative sentence, the court may modify or revoke the alternative sentence and
commit the defendant to an institution.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 533 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide a report on or before July 1,
2026, and July 1 of each year thereafter to the Kentucky State Corrections Commission
and to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Judiciary and the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children,
detailing:
(1) The number and percentage of defendants that are found by a court to be a
primary caretaker of a dependent child;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1529
(2) The age, sex, race, and ethnicity of defendants found by a court to be a primary
caretaker of a dependent child;
(3) The age, sex, race, and ethnicity of the dependent children of defendants found
by a court to be a primary caretaker of a dependent child;
(4) The number and percentage of defendants found by a court to be a primary
caretaker of a dependent child that are given an alternative sentence;
(5) The number and percentage of defendants found not to be a primary caretaker of
a dependent child that are given an alternative sentence; and
(6) The number and percentage of defendants found by a court to be a primary
caretaker of a dependent child, who were given an alternative sentence that was
subsequently revoked, and the reasons for the revocation.
Section 4. This Act may be cited as the Primary Caretaker Consideration Act.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/6/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed